North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-12.2 Beekeeping [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 70, § 3]

4-12.2-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 92, § 2; 1987, ch. 85, § 1; 1989, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 64, § 1; 1993, ch. 55, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-02.
Rulemaking authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 92, § 2; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-03.
Emergency
orders and rules. [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-04.
Beekeeper’s license required. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 92, § 2; 1989, ch. 79, § 3; 1991, ch. 64, § 2; 1993, ch. 55, § 2; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-04.1.
Application of minors for beekeeper’s license — Liability for minor. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 94, § 1; 1987, ch. 85, § 2; 1989, ch. 79, § 4; 1991, ch. 64, § 3; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-05.
License fees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 92, § 2; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-06.
Assessment of fees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 92, § 2; 1987, ch. 85, § 7; 1989, ch. 79, § 5; 1991, ch. 64, § 4; 1993, ch. 55, § 3; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-07.
Registration of an apiary. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 92, § 2; 1987, ch. 85, § 3; 1989, ch. 79, § 6; 1991, ch. 64, § 5; 1993, ch. 55, § 4; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-08.
Revocation of location by property owner. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 92, § 2; 1991, ch. 64, § 6; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-08.1.
Revocation of registration of an apiary. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 64, § 7; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-09.
Establishment
of commercial locations — Two-mile radius restriction —
Sale of location. [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-10.
Establishment
of pollination locations. [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-11.
Establishment
of property owner locations. [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-12.
Establishment
of noncommercial locations. [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-13.
Occupation
of locations — Vacancy allowance. [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-14.
Identification of colonies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 92, § 2; 1989, ch. 79, § 9; 1991, ch. 64, § 8; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-15.
State bee inspector — Appointment — Qualifications. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 92, § 2; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-16.
Bee inspector — Duties — Powers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 92, § 2; 1993, ch. 55, § 5; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-17.
Bees maintained
in hives with movable frames. [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-18.
Certificate of health — Issuance. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 92, § 2; 1985, ch. 94, § 3; 1991, ch. 64, § 9; 1993, ch. 55, § 6; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-18.1.
Africanized honeybees — Regulated areas. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 55, § 7; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-18.2.
Africanized honeybees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 55, § 8; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-19.
Infected
bees and equipment — Sale or exposure. [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-20.
Shipment into state — Permit — Fees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 92, § 2; 1991, ch. 64, § 11; 1993, ch. 55, § 9; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-21.
Abandoned apiary and abandoned equipment — Seizure, destruction, or sale. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 92, § 2; 1991, ch. 64, § 12; 1993, ch. 55, § 10; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-22.
Penalties — Criminal — Civil — License revocation or nonrenewal. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 92, § 2; 1985, ch. 94, § 4; 1991, ch. 64, § 13; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-23.
Confiscation and disposal. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 92, § 2; 1989, ch. 79, § 10; 1993, ch. 55, § 11; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-24.
Service of process on beekeeper. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 92, § 2; 1989, ch. 79, § 11; 1991, ch. 64, § 14; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

4-12.2-25.
Beekeeping considered agricultural enterprise. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 92, § 2; repealed by 2015, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.